test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-u_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - akku:
    akku+N+Sg+Nom:  akku
    akku+N+Sg+Gen:  aaku
    akku+N+Sg+Ill:  aakun
    akku+N+Sg+Loc:  aakust
    akku+N+Sg+Com:  akkuin
    akku+N+Sg+Abe:  akuttáá
    akku+N+Ess:  akkun
    akku+N+Pl+Nom:  aakuh
    akku+N+Pl+Gen: [aakui, akui]
    akku+N+Pl+Acc:  aakuid
    akku+N+Pl+Ill:  akkuid
    akku+N+Pl+Loc:  aakuin
    akku+N+Pl+Com:  akuiguin
    akku+N+Pl+Abe:  akuittáá

  Noun - laŋkku:
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Nom:  laŋkku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Gen:  laaŋku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Ill:  laaŋkun
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Loc:  laaŋkust
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Com:  laŋkkuin
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Abe:  laŋkuttáá
    laŋkku+N+Ess:  laŋkkun
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Nom:  laaŋkuh
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Gen: [laaŋkui, laŋkui]
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Acc:  laaŋkuid
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Ill:  laŋkkuid
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Loc:  laaŋkuin
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Com:  laŋkuiguin
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Abe:  laŋkuittáá

  Noun - tavlu:
    tavlu+N+Sg+Nom:  tavlu
    tavlu+N+Sg+Gen:  taavlu
    tavlu+N+Sg+Ill:  taavlun
    tavlu+N+Sg+Loc:  taavlust
    tavlu+N+Sg+Com:  tavluin
    tavlu+N+Sg+Abe:  tavluttáá
    tavlu+N+Ess:  tavlun
    tavlu+N+Pl+Nom:  taavluh
    tavlu+N+Pl+Gen: [taavlui, tavlui]
    tavlu+N+Pl+Acc:  taavluid
    tavlu+N+Pl+Ill:  tavluid
    tavlu+N+Pl+Loc:  taavluin
    tavlu+N+Pl+Com:  tavluiguin
    tavlu+N+Pl+Abe:  tavluittáá

  Noun - rapu:
    rapu+N+Sg+Nom:  rapu
    rapu+N+Sg+Gen:  rapu
    rapu+N+Sg+Ill:  rapun
    rapu+N+Sg+Loc:  rapust
    rapu+N+Sg+Com:  rapuin
    rapu+N+Sg+Abe:  raputtáá
    rapu+N+Ess:  rapun
    rapu+N+Pl+Nom:  rapuh
    rapu+N+Pl+Gen:  rapui
    rapu+N+Pl+Acc:  rapuid
    rapu+N+Pl+Ill:  rapuid
    rapu+N+Pl+Loc:  rapuin
    rapu+N+Pl+Com:  rapuiguin
    rapu+N+Pl+Abe:  rapuittáá

  Noun - lamppu:
    lamppu+N+Sg+Nom:  lamppu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Gen:  laampu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Ill:  laampun
    lamppu+N+Sg+Loc:  laampust
    lamppu+N+Sg+Com:  lamppuin
    lamppu+N+Sg+Abe:  lamputtáá
    lamppu+N+Ess:  lamppun
    lamppu+N+Pl+Nom:  laampuh
    lamppu+N+Pl+Gen: [laampui, lampui]
    lamppu+N+Pl+Acc:  laampuid
    lamppu+N+Pl+Ill:  lamppuid
    lamppu+N+Pl+Loc:  laampuin
    lamppu+N+Pl+Com:  lampuiguin
    lamppu+N+Pl+Abe:  lampuittáá

  Noun - harppu:
    harppu+N+Sg+Nom:  harppu
    harppu+N+Sg+Gen:  haarpu
    harppu+N+Sg+Ill:  haarpun
    harppu+N+Sg+Loc:  haarpust
    harppu+N+Sg+Com:  harppuin
    harppu+N+Sg+Abe:  harputtáá
    harppu+N+Ess:  harppun
    harppu+N+Pl+Nom:  haarpuh
    harppu+N+Pl+Gen: [haarpui, harpui]
    harppu+N+Pl+Acc:  haarpuid
    harppu+N+Pl+Ill:  harppuid
    harppu+N+Pl+Loc:  haarpuin
    harppu+N+Pl+Com:  harpuiguin
    harppu+N+Pl+Abe:  harpuittáá

  Noun - lanttu:
    lanttu+N+Sg+Nom:  lanttu
    lanttu+N+Sg+Gen:  laantu
    lanttu+N+Sg+Ill:  laantun
    lanttu+N+Sg+Loc:  laantust
    lanttu+N+Sg+Com:  lanttuin
    lanttu+N+Sg+Abe:  lantuttáá
    lanttu+N+Ess:  lanttun
    lanttu+N+Pl+Nom:  laantuh
    lanttu+N+Pl+Gen: [laantui, lantui]
    lanttu+N+Pl+Acc:  laantuid
    lanttu+N+Pl+Ill:  lanttuid
    lanttu+N+Pl+Loc:  laantuin
    lanttu+N+Pl+Com:  lantuiguin
    lanttu+N+Pl+Abe:  lantuittáá

  Noun - haalu:
    haalu+N+Sg+Nom:  haalu
    haalu+N+Sg+Gen:  haalu
    haalu+N+Sg+Ill:  haalun
    haalu+N+Sg+Loc:  haalust
    haalu+N+Sg+Com:  haaluin
    haalu+N+Sg+Abe:  haluttáá
    haalu+N+Ess:  haallun
    haalu+N+Pl+Nom:  haaluh
    haalu+N+Pl+Gen: [haalui, halui]
    haalu+N+Pl+Acc:  haaluid
    haalu+N+Pl+Ill:  haaluid
    haalu+N+Pl+Loc:  haaluin
    haalu+N+Pl+Com:  haluiguin
    haalu+N+Pl+Abe:  haluittáá

  Noun - kaasu:
    kaasu+N+Sg+Nom:  kaasu
    kaasu+N+Sg+Gen:  kaasu
    kaasu+N+Sg+Ill:  kaasun
    kaasu+N+Sg+Loc:  kaasust
    kaasu+N+Sg+Com:  kaasuin
    kaasu+N+Sg+Abe:  kaasuttáá
    kaasu+N+Ess:  kaasun
    kaasu+N+Pl+Nom:  kaasuh
    kaasu+N+Pl+Gen:  kaasui
    kaasu+N+Pl+Acc:  kaasuid
    kaasu+N+Pl+Ill:  kaasuid
    kaasu+N+Pl+Loc:  kaasuin
    kaasu+N+Pl+Com:  kaasuiguin
    kaasu+N+Pl+Abe:  kaasuittáá

  Noun - lenccu:
    lenccu+N+Sg+Nom:  lenccu
    lenccu+N+Sg+Gen:  leencu
    lenccu+N+Sg+Ill:  leencun
    lenccu+N+Sg+Loc:  leencust
    lenccu+N+Sg+Com:  lenccuin
    lenccu+N+Sg+Abe:  lencuttáá
    lenccu+N+Ess:  lenccun
    lenccu+N+Pl+Nom:  leencuh
    lenccu+N+Pl+Gen: [leencui, lencui]
    lenccu+N+Pl+Acc:  leencuid
    lenccu+N+Pl+Ill:  lenccuid
    lenccu+N+Pl+Loc:  leencuin
    lenccu+N+Pl+Com:  lencuiguin
    lenccu+N+Pl+Abe:  lencuittáá

  Noun - hersku:
    hersku+N+Sg+Nom:  hersku
    hersku+N+Sg+Gen:  heersku
    hersku+N+Sg+Ill:  heerskun
    hersku+N+Sg+Loc:  heerskust
    hersku+N+Sg+Com:  herskoin
    hersku+N+Sg+Abe:  herskuttáá
    hersku+N+Ess:  herskun
    hersku+N+Pl+Nom:  heerskuh
    hersku+N+Pl+Gen: [heerskui, herskui]
    hersku+N+Pl+Acc:  heerskuid
    hersku+N+Pl+Ill:  herskoid
    hersku+N+Pl+Loc:  heerskuin
    hersku+N+Pl+Com:  herskuiguin
    hersku+N+Pl+Abe:  herskuittáá

  Noun - reppu:
    reppu+N+Sg+Nom:  reppu
    reppu+N+Sg+Gen:  reepu
    reppu+N+Sg+Ill:  reepun
    reppu+N+Sg+Loc:  reepust
    reppu+N+Sg+Com:  reppoin
    reppu+N+Sg+Abe:  reputtáá
    reppu+N+Ess:  reppun
    reppu+N+Pl+Nom:  reepuh
    reppu+N+Pl+Gen: [reepui, repui]
    reppu+N+Pl+Acc:  reepuid
    reppu+N+Pl+Ill:  reppoid
    reppu+N+Pl+Loc:  reepuin
    reppu+N+Pl+Com:  repuiguin
    reppu+N+Pl+Abe:  repuittáá

  Noun - lippu:
    lippu+N+Sg+Nom:  lippu
    lippu+N+Sg+Gen:  liipu
    lippu+N+Sg+Ill:  liipun
    lippu+N+Sg+Loc:  liipust
    lippu+N+Sg+Com:  lippuin
    lippu+N+Sg+Abe:  liputtáá
    lippu+N+Ess:  lippun
    lippu+N+Pl+Nom:  liipuh
    lippu+N+Pl+Gen: [liipui, lipui]
    lippu+N+Pl+Acc:  liipuid
    lippu+N+Pl+Ill:  lippuid
    lippu+N+Pl+Loc:  liipuin
    lippu+N+Pl+Com:  lipuittáá
    lippu+N+Pl+Abe:  icu

  Noun - liidu:
    liidu+N+Sg+Nom:  liidu
    liidu+N+Sg+Gen:  liidu
    liidu+N+Sg+Ill:  liidun
    liidu+N+Sg+Loc:  liidust
    liidu+N+Sg+Com:  liiduin
    liidu+N+Sg+Abe:  liiduttáá
    liidu+N+Ess:  liidun
    liidu+N+Pl+Nom:  liiduh
    liidu+N+Pl+Gen:  liidui
    liidu+N+Pl+Acc:  liiduid
    liidu+N+Pl+Ill:  liiduid
    liidu+N+Pl+Loc:  liiduin
    liidu+N+Pl+Com:  liiduiguin
    liidu+N+Pl+Abe:  liiduittáá

  Noun - kiilu:
    kiilu+N+Sg+Nom:  kiilu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Gen:  kiilu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Ill:  kiilun
    kiilu+N+Sg+Loc:  kiilust
    kiilu+N+Sg+Com:  kiiluin
    kiilu+N+Sg+Abe:  kiluttáá
    kiilu+N+Ess:  kiillun
    kiilu+N+Pl+Nom:  kiiluh
    kiilu+N+Pl+Gen:  kiilui
    kiilu+N+Pl+Acc:  kiiluid
    kiilu+N+Pl+Ill:  kiiluid
    kiilu+N+Pl+Loc:  kiiluin
    kiilu+N+Pl+Com:  kiluiguin
    kiilu+N+Pl+Abe:  kiluittáá

  Noun - piiru:
    piiru+N+Sg+Nom:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Gen:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Ill:  piirun
    piiru+N+Sg+Loc:  piirust
    piiru+N+Sg+Com:  piiruin
    piiru+N+Sg+Abe:  piruttáá
    piiru+N+Ess:  piirrun
    piiru+N+Pl+Nom:  piiruh
    piiru+N+Pl+Gen: [piirui, pirui]
    piiru+N+Pl+Acc:  piiruid
    piiru+N+Pl+Ill:  piiruid
    piiru+N+Pl+Loc:  piiruin
    piiru+N+Pl+Com:  piruiguin
    piiru+N+Pl+Abe:  piruittáaá

  Noun - niisu:
    niisu+N+Sg+Nom:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Gen:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Ill:  niisun
    niisu+N+Sg+Loc:  niisust
    niisu+N+Sg+Com:  niisuin
    niisu+N+Sg+Abe:  nisuttáá
    niisu+N+Ess:  niissun
    niisu+N+Pl+Nom:  niisuh
    niisu+N+Pl+Gen: [niisui, nisui]
    niisu+N+Pl+Acc:  niisuid
    niisu+N+Pl+Ill:  niisuid
    niisu+N+Pl+Loc:  niisuin
    niisu+N+Pl+Com:  nisuiguin
    niisu+N+Pl+Abe:  nisuittáá

  Noun - láigu:
    láigu+N+Sg+Nom:  láigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Gen:  lááigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Ill:  lááigun
    láigu+N+Sg+Loc:  lááigust
    láigu+N+Sg+Com:  láigoin
    láigu+N+Sg+Abe:  láiguttáá
    láigu+N+Ess:  láigun
    láigu+N+Pl+Nom:  lááiguh
    láigu+N+Pl+Gen: [lááigui, láigui]
    láigu+N+Pl+Acc:  lááiguid
    láigu+N+Pl+Ill:  láigoid
    láigu+N+Pl+Loc:  lááiguin
    láigu+N+Pl+Com:  láiguiguin
    láigu+N+Pl+Abe:  láiguittáá

  Noun - sáigu:
    sáigu+N+Sg+Nom:  sáigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Gen:  sááigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Ill:  sááigun
    sáigu+N+Sg+Loc:  sááigust
    sáigu+N+Sg+Com:  sáigoin
    sáigu+N+Sg+Abe:  sáiguttáá
    sáigu+N+Ess:  sáigun
    sáigu+N+Pl+Nom:  sááiguh
    sáigu+N+Pl+Gen: [sááigui, sáigui]
    sáigu+N+Pl+Acc:  sááiguid
    sáigu+N+Pl+Ill:  sáigoid
    sáigu+N+Pl+Loc:  sááiguin
    sáigu+N+Pl+Com:  sáiguguin
    sáigu+N+Pl+Abe:  sáiguittáá

  Noun - áimu:
    áimu+N+Sg+Nom:  áimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááimun
    áimu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááimust
    áimu+N+Sg+Com:  áimoin
    áimu+N+Sg+Abe:  áimuttáá
    áimu+N+Ess:  áimun
    áimu+N+Pl+Nom:  ááimuh
    áimu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááimui, áimui]
    áimu+N+Pl+Acc:  ááimuid
    áimu+N+Pl+Ill:  áimoid
    áimu+N+Pl+Loc:  ááimuin
    áimu+N+Pl+Com:  áimuiguin
    áimu+N+Pl+Abe:  áimuittáá

  Noun - váimu:
    váimu+N+Sg+Nom:  váimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Gen:  vááimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Ill:  vááimun
    váimu+N+Sg+Loc:  vááimust
    váimu+N+Sg+Com:  váimoin
    váimu+N+Sg+Abe:  váimuttáá
    váimu+N+Ess:  váimun
    váimu+N+Pl+Nom:  vááimuh
    váimu+N+Pl+Gen: [vááimui, váimui]
    váimu+N+Pl+Acc:  vááimuid
    váimu+N+Pl+Ill:  váimoid
    váimu+N+Pl+Loc:  vááimuin
    váimu+N+Pl+Com:  váimuguin
    váimu+N+Pl+Abe:  vÀimuittáá

  Noun - váinu:
    váinu+N+Sg+Nom:  váinu
    váinu+N+Sg+Gen:  vááinu
    váinu+N+Sg+Ill:  vááinun
    váinu+N+Sg+Loc:  vááinust
    váinu+N+Sg+Com:  váinoin
    váinu+N+Sg+Abe:  váinuttáá
    váinu+N+Ess:  váinun
    váinu+N+Pl+Nom:  vááinuh
    váinu+N+Pl+Gen: [vááinu, váinui]
    váinu+N+Pl+Acc:  vááinuid
    váinu+N+Pl+Ill:  váinoid
    váinu+N+Pl+Loc:  vááinuin
    váinu+N+Pl+Com:  váinuiguin
    váinu+N+Pl+Abe:  váinuittáá

  Noun - áiru:
    áiru+N+Sg+Nom:  áiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Gen:  ááiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Ill:  ááirun
    áiru+N+Sg+Loc:  ááirust
    áiru+N+Sg+Com:  áiroin
    áiru+N+Sg+Abe:  áiruttáá
    áiru+N+Ess:  áirun
    áiru+N+Pl+Nom:  ááiruh
    áiru+N+Pl+Gen: [ááirui, áirui]
    áiru+N+Pl+Acc:  ááiruid
    áiru+N+Pl+Ill:  áiroid
    áiru+N+Pl+Loc:  ááiruin
    áiru+N+Pl+Com:  áiruiguin
    áiru+N+Pl+Abe:  áiruittáá

  Noun - káiru:
    káiru+N+Sg+Nom:  káiru
    káiru+N+Sg+Gen:  kááiru
    káiru+N+Sg+Ill:  kááirun
    káiru+N+Sg+Loc:  kááirust
    káiru+N+Sg+Com:  káiroin
    káiru+N+Sg+Abe:  káiruttáá
    káiru+N+Ess:  káirun
    káiru+N+Pl+Nom:  kááiruh
    káiru+N+Pl+Gen: [kááirui, káirui]
    káiru+N+Pl+Acc:  kááiruid
    káiru+N+Pl+Ill:  káiroid
    káiru+N+Pl+Loc:  kááiruin
    káiru+N+Pl+Com:  káiruiguin
    káiru+N+Pl+Abe:  káiruittáá

  Noun - čáittu:
    čáittu+N+Sg+Nom:  čáittu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Gen:  čááitu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Ill:  čááitun
    čáittu+N+Sg+Loc:  čááitust
    čáittu+N+Sg+Com:  čáittoin
    čáittu+N+Sg+Abe:  čáituttáá
    čáittu+N+Ess:  čáittun
    čáittu+N+Pl+Nom:  čááituh
    čáittu+N+Pl+Gen: [čááitui, čáitui]
    čáittu+N+Pl+Acc:  čááituid
    čáittu+N+Pl+Ill:  čáittoid
    čáittu+N+Pl+Loc:  čááituin
    čáittu+N+Pl+Com:  čáituiguin
    čáittu+N+Pl+Abe:  čáituittáá

  Noun - káivu:
    káivu+N+Sg+Nom:  káivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Gen:  kááivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Ill:  kááivun
    káivu+N+Sg+Loc:  kááivust
    káivu+N+Sg+Com:  káivoin
    káivu+N+Sg+Abe:  káivuttáá
    káivu+N+Ess:  káivun
    káivu+N+Pl+Nom:  kááivuh
    káivu+N+Pl+Gen: [kááivui, káivui]
    káivu+N+Pl+Acc:  kááivuid
    káivu+N+Pl+Ill:  káivoid
    káivu+N+Pl+Loc:  kááivuin
    káivu+N+Pl+Com:  káivuiguin
    káivu+N+Pl+Abe:  káivuittáá

  Noun - ráiđu:
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Nom:  ráiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Gen:  rááiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Ill:  rááiđun
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Loc:  rááiđust
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Com:  ráiđoin
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Abe:  ráiđuttáá
    ráiđu+N+Ess:  ráiđun
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Nom:  rááiđuh
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Gen: [rááiđui, ráiđui]
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Acc:  rááiđuid
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Ill:  ráiđoid
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Loc:  rááiđuin
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Com:  ráiđuiguin
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Abe:  ráiđuittáá
